Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Revenue shall attach to personal income tax returns
required to be filed under this chapter a schedule that allows taxpayers to  provide to the
department, at the time of filing the return and on a voluntary  basis, self-reported identifi-
cation of the taxpayer’s race and ethnicity.
(2) The data collection schedule required under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Allow each taxpayer to select from the full list of demographic data categories  of
racial or ethnic identity adopted as uniform standards  by the Oregon Health Authority pur-
suant to ORS 413.161.
(b) Allow each individual listed on a return to select one primary identifier and  as many
as two additional identifiers.
(c) Provide that individuals filing a joint return  may each elect whether to indicate
identifiers on the schedule.
(d) Be accompanied by  the statement that the collection of data is voluntary and self-
reported and that the department may not use the collected data for  the purposes of audit,
collection or other enforcement activities.
(e) Be accompanied by a statement explaining the purpose of collecting data for use  in
analysis of revenue policy.
(f) Be optional to complete, but provide that individuals  shall opt out of completion of the
schedule.
(3) The department shall establish policies and procedures to enable individuals  who are
not required to file an income tax return under this chapter for a given tax year to elect  to
complete the schedule provided under this section without filing a return.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 to 8 of this 2023 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS chapter
305.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Revenue shall:
(a) Ensure that all data collected pursuant to section 2 of this 2023  Act is used only for
the purposes described in sections 2 and 7 of this 2023 Act.
(b) Maintain and store data  collected pursuant to section 2 of this 2023 Act separately
from other information provided on tax returns filed under  ORS chapter 316, and provide
that the data is accessible only to the following:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1 (SB 1-B) Page 1
(A) Research section staff of the department.
(B) Other department staff that are assigned to process the data  and process or program
the underlying systems for  the data collection schedule, but only to the extent necessary for
that purpose.
(C) The staff of the Legislative Revenue Office.
(D) The division of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services that serves as
office of economic analysis.
(c) Maintain records sufficient to verify that Department of Revenue personnel having
access to data collected pursuant to section 2  of this 2023 Act are limited to those personnel
listed in paragraph (b)(A) and (B) of this subsection and sufficient to ensure compliance  with
this subsection.
(2) Tax practitioners and tax preparation  software vendors may use and retain data col-
lected pursuant to section  2 of this 2023 Act only to the extent necessary to assist taxpayers
in the preparing and filing of returns required under ORS chapter 316 and may not use the
data, or allow it to be used, for any other reason.
(3) Notwithstanding any intergovernmental reciprocal agreements entered into by the
Department of Revenue, the department may not allow the Internal Revenue Service access
to the data collected under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
Not later than September 15 of each  year, beginning in 2024, the Department
of Revenue shall report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the status of the devel-
opment and implementation  of the data collection schedule required under section 2 of this
2023 Act and on the use of  the data collected, to an appropriate committee or interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly related to information management  and technology. The
report required by this section shall include an update of the effectiveness of measures
undertaken by the department to ensure data security. The report shall address the pre-
vention of any sharing of data collected pursuant to section 2 of this 2023 Act:
(1) Within the department, between research staff and audit and collection staff.
(2) Between the department and the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) Between tax practitioners and commercial interests.
(4) Between tax preparation software vendors and commercial interests.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 7. (1) The Department of Revenue shall use data  collected on the data col-
lection schedule required under section 2 of this 2023 Act to the extent feasible, to inform:
(a) The development of racial impact statements;
(b) The analysis of proposed administrative rules and budget requests; and
(c) The response by the department to certain requests for information from  the Legis-
lative Assembly.
(2) If the Department of Revenue, the Legislative Revenue Officer or  the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services  includes data collected under section 2 of this 2023 Act
in a report or as other output, the data shall be presented only in aggregated and
anonymized form.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Department of Revenue shall first  attach the data collection sched-
ule required under section 2 of this 2023 Act to income tax returns filed for the 2024 tax year.
(2) The department shall develop  programming and forms for the implementation of the
schedule and, by rule, shall adopt  policies and procedures for the implementation of the use
of the schedule.
SECTION 9. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is increased by  $259,658, for developing a schedule allowing personal
income taxpayers to voluntarily report self-identified race and ethnicity identifiers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1 (SB 1-B) Page 2
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled House
Bill 5034), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Information Technology Services
Division, is increased by $164,842, for developing and maintaining data collection of  self-
identified race and ethnicity identifiers.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled House
Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for administration, is  increased by $46,224,
for the research and development of racial impact statements.
SECTION 10. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5034), collected or received
by the Department of Revenue, for  the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is increased
by $6,357, for developing a schedule allowing  personal income taxpayers to voluntarily report
self-identified race and ethnicity identifiers.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5034), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from fed-
eral service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in sec-
tion 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5034), collected or received by the
Department of Revenue, for the Information Technology Services Division,  is increased by
$11,460, for developing and maintaining  data collection of self-identified race and ethnicity
identifiers.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5034), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from fed-
eral service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in sec-
tion 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5034), collected or received by the
Department of Revenue, for administration, is increased by $10,392,  for the research and
development of racial impact statements.
SECTION 11. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1 (SB 1-B) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1 (SB 1-B) Page 4